Hawaii statutes.
§436E-5 Qualifications for examination.
(a) No person shall be licensed to practice acupuncture unless the person has
passed an examination and has been found to have the necessary qualifications
as prescribed in the rules adopted by the board pursuant to chapter 91.

(b) Prior to September 1, 2000, and except as
provided in subsection (c), before any applicant shall be eligible for the
examination, the applicant shall furnish satisfactory proof to the board that
the applicant has received a total of not less than one thousand five hundred
hours of education and training consisting of:

(1) A formal program in the science of acupuncture
(traditional oriental medicine) at an institute or school approved by the board
that:

(A) Shall be for a period of not less than
two academic years (not less than six hundred hours); and

(B) Shall result in the award of a
certificate or diploma; and

(2) One clinical year in a clinical internship
program (not less than twelve months and not less than nine hundred hours)
supervised by a licensed acupuncturist; provided that the nine hundred hours of
the clinical internship program may be obtained from the institute or school
awarding the certificate or diploma or may be obtained under the supervision of
a licensed acupuncturist not affiliated with an institute or school.

(c) Students who started training prior to
December 31, 1984, in a school approved by the board prior to December 31,
1984, and who complete their training by December 31, 1989, and who file an
application with the board before September 1, 2000 shall:

(1) Not lose their rights of continued education, and
earned or accumulated credits; and

(2) For the purposes of this chapter, meet
requirements for examination and licensure as provided in chapter 436D and
rules adopted by the board as they existed on December 31, 1984; provided that
the school has not altered its program so as to lower the standards for
completion of the program. These students may qualify for examination if they
submit evidence of having completed:

(A) At least eighteen months (not less than
five hundred seventy-six hours) of academic training; and

(B) At least six months (not less than four
hundred eighty hours) of clinical training in the practice of acupuncture on
human subjects under the supervision of a licensed acupuncturist.

(d) Notwithstanding subsections (b) and (c),
effective September 1, 2000, before any applicant shall be eligible to take the
licensing examination, the applicant shall furnish satisfactory proof to the
board that the applicant has completed a formal acupuncture program and has
received a total of at least two thousand, one hundred seventy-five hours of
academic and clinical training consisting of an academic program of at least
one thousand, five hundred fifteen hours in the science of acupuncture
(traditional oriental medicine) and a clinical training program of at least six
hundred sixty hours under the supervision of a licensed acupuncturist, which
shall result in the award of a certificate or diploma. For applicants who
graduated from an institute, school, or college located in the United States or
any territory under the jurisdiction of the United States, the institute,
school, or college shall be accredited or recognized as a candidate for accreditation
by any acupuncture or oriental medicine accrediting body recognized by the
United States Department of Education. For applicants who graduated from a
foreign institute, school, or college with a formal program in the science of
acupuncture, the applicant, at the applicant's own expense, shall have the
applicant's transcripts and curriculum evaluated by a board approved and
designated professional evaluator who shall make a determination whether the
transcripts and curriculum are at least equivalent to that of the United States
accredited acupuncture program, and that the foreign institute is licensed,
approved, or accredited by the appropriate governmental authority or an agency
recognized by a governmental authority in the respective foreign jurisdiction
and whose curriculum is approved by the board. [L 1985, c 214, pt of §1; am L
1993, c 194, §1; am L 1997, c 226, §1; am L 2008, c 21, §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next